District of Columbia statutes.
9-1103.06

Jurisdiction to review orders of Washington Metropolitan Area Transit Commission and to enforce Compact.

Jurisdiction is hereby conferred:

(1)

Upon the United States Court of Appeals for the Fourth Circuit and the United States Court of Appeals for the District of Columbia Circuit, respectively, to review orders of the Washington Metropolitan Area Transit Commission as provided by § 5, Article XII, Title II, of the Washington Metropolitan Area Transit Regulation Compact; and

(2)

Upon the United States district courts to enforce the provisions of said Title II as provided in § 6, Article XII, Title II, of said Compact.

History

Sept. 15, 1960, 74 Stat. 1051, Pub. L. 86-794, § 6

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-2416.
1973 Ed., § 1-1415.

Editor's Notes

This section was enacted prior to revision of the Compact. References to specific sections of the Compact have been updated following revision of the Compact.